Utah statutes.
71-11-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Administrator" means a Veterans' Nursing Home Administrator selected in
accordance with Section 71-11-5.
(2)  "Board" means any Veterans' Nursing Home Advisory Board.
(3)  "Department" means the Department of Veterans' Affairs created in Section
71-8-2.
(4)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of
Veterans' Affairs.
(5)  "Home" means any Utah Veterans' Nursing Home.
(6)  "Veteran" shall have the same meaning as found in Subsection 71-10-1(5).
